ja: 行数カウンターメカニズム: デジタル (電子式); レバー; 手動ダイヤル (回転リング); プッシュボタンクリッカー; スライダー; その他
zh-CN: 行数计数器机制: 数字（电子）; 杠杆; 手动拨盘（旋转环）; 按钮式按压器; 滑块; 其他
en: Row counter mechanism: Digital (electronic); Lever; Manual dial (rotating rings); Push button clicker; Slider; Other
vi: Cơ chế đếm hàng: Kỹ thuật số (điện tử); Đòn bẩy; Xoay thủ công (vòng xoay); Nút bấm đếm; Thanh trượt; Khác
sl-SI: Mehanizem števca vrstic: Digitalen (elektronski); Ročica; Ročna številčnica (vrtljivi obročki); Kliker z gumbom; Drsnik; Drugo
ko: 행 카운터 메커니즘: 디지털(전자식); 레버; 수동 다이얼(회전 링); 푸시 버튼 클리커; 슬라이더; 기타
fi: Kerroslaskurin mekanismi: Digitaalinen (elektroninen); Vipu; Manuaalinen säädin (pyörivät renkaat); Painikenaksutin; Liukusäädin; Muu
hr-HR: Mehanizam brojača redova: Digitalni (elektronički); Poluga; Ručno okretanje (okretni prstenovi); Kliker s gumbom; Klizač; Ostalo
sk-SK: Mechanizmus počítadla riadkov: Digitálny (elektronický); Páčka; Manuálny ciferník (otočné krúžky); Tlačidlové klikadlo; Posuvník; Iné
lt-LT: Eilių skaitiklio mechanizmas: Skaitmeninis (elektroninis); Svirtis; Rankinis ratukas (besisukantys žiedai); Mygtukinis spragtukas; Slankiklis; Kita
hu: Sorszámláló mechanizmusa: Digitális (elektronikus); Karos; Kézi tárcsás (forgatható gyűrűk); Nyomógombos számláló; Csúszkás; Egyéb
pt-BR: Contador de carreiras mecanismo: Digital (eletrônico); Alavanca; Mostrador manual (anéis rotativos); Clicker com botão de pressão; Controle deslizante; Outro
ru: Механизм счетчика рядов: Цифровой (электронный); Рычажный; Ручной диск (вращающиеся кольца); Кнопочный кликер; Ползунок; Другое
tr: Sıra sayacı mekanizması: Dijital (elektronik); Kol; Manuel kadran (dönen halkalar); Düğmeli sayaç; Kaydırıcı; Diğer
nb: Radtellermekanisme: Digital (elektronisk); Spak; Manuell skive (roterende ringer); Trykknapp-klikker; Glidebryter; Annet
nl: Rijenteller mechanisme: Digitaal (elektronisch); Hendel; Handmatige knop (draaibare ringen); Drukknopklikker; Schuif; Overige
el: Μηχανισμός μετρητή σειρών: Ψηφιακός (ηλεκτρονικός); Μοχλός; Χειροκίνητος επιλογέας (περιστρεφόμενοι δακτύλιοι); Μετρητής με κουμπί πίεσης (clicker); Συρόμενος; Άλλο
cs: Mechanismus počítadla řádků: Digitální (elektronický); Páčka; Manuální ciferník (otočné kroužky); Tlačítkový klikr; Posuvník; Jiné
it: Meccanismo del contatore di ferri: Digitale (elettronico); A levetta; A rotella manuale (anelli rotanti); A pulsante; A cursore; Altro
bg-BG: Механизъм на брояча на редове: Дигитален (електронен); Лостче; Ръчен циферблат (въртящи се пръстени); Кликер с бутон; Плъзгач; Друго
pl: Mechanizm licznika rzędów: Cyfrowy (elektroniczny); Dźwignia; Tarcza ręczna (obracające się pierścienie); Klikacz z przyciskiem; Suwak; Inny
pt-PT: Mecanismo do contador de carreiras: Digital (eletrónico); Alavanca; Mostrador manual (anéis rotativos); Botão de pressão (clicker); Deslizador; Outro
ro-RO: Mecanismul numărătorului de rânduri: Digital (electronic); Manetă; Cadran manual (inele rotative); Clicker cu buton; Glisor; Altele
sv: Radräknemekanism: Digital (elektronisk); Spak; Manuellt vred (roterande ringar); Tryckknappsklickare; Skjutreglage; Övrigt
de: Mechanismus des Reihenzählers: Digital (elektronisch); Hebel; Manuelles Zifferblatt (drehbare Ringe); Druckknopf-Klicker; Schieberegler; Sonstige
da: Rækketællermekanisme: Digital (elektronisk); Håndtag; Manuel drejeknap (roterende ringe); Trykknap-klikker; Skyder; Andet
fr: Mécanisme du compte-rangs: Numérique (électronique); Levier; Cadran manuel (anneaux rotatifs); Bouton-poussoir; Curseur; Autre
es: Mecanismo del contador de hileras: Digital (electrónico); Palanca; Dial manual (anillos giratorios); Clicador de botón pulsador; Control deslizante; Otro
zh-TW: 行數計數器機制: 數位 (電子); 槓桿; 手動轉盤 (旋轉環); 按鈕計數器; 滑桿; 其他
th: กลไกตัวนับแถว: ดิจิทัล (อิเล็กทรอนิกส์); คันโยก; หมุนด้วยมือ (วงแหวนหมุน); ปุ่มกด; แถบเลื่อน; อื่นๆ